Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.26.150

Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to:

(1) A special deposit made under an account agreement executed on or after July 1, 2024; and

(2) A deposit made under an account agreement executed before July 1, 2024, if:

(a) All parties entitled to amend the account agreement agree to make the deposit a special deposit governed by this chapter; and

(b) The special deposit referenced in the amended account agreement satisfies RCW 30A.26.040.

[ 2024 c 23 s 16.]